Hawaii statutes.
§841-15 Notice to next of kin, expense.
The coroner called to investigate the death of any person shall notify the next
of kin, if known, of the death by telephone, letter, cable, or radiogram, as
each case may necessitate. The director of finance of the county in which the
death occurs may make the disbursement necessary to defray the expenses
involved in the notification. [L 1943, c 209, §2; RL 1945, §10914; RL 1955,
§260-15; HRS §715-15; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1]

Revision Note

The words "treasurer or", preceding "director
of finance", deleted to conform to county charters.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next